dictsource/az_rules
 
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Azerbaijani

// Stress rule: Right-most vowel, but stop before the vowel which is
// marked as unstressed [%].

.L02 ı a o u   // back vowels
.L03 i e ö ü

.group a
        a        a
        ai (K    aI
     -) a (_     a

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        dZ

.group ç
        ç        tS

.group d
        d        d

     -) dan (_   d%an
     -) dən (_   d%&n
     -) dək (_   d%&k
     
.group e
        e        e

.group ə
        ə        &
     @) ə (_     %&
     -) ə (_     %&

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        J

.group ğ
        ğ        Q
     A) ğ        : 
     a) ğa       :
     o) ğo       :
     u) ğu       :
     ö) ğö       :
     ü) ğü       :
     i) ğ        j
     e) ğ        j

.group h
        h        h

.group x
        x        x

.group ı
        ı        @

.group i
        i        i
        
     @) iya (_   =i;a

.group j
        j        Z

.group k
        k        c
        k (K     C

.group q
        q        g
        q (_     x

.group l
        l        l
        l (L02   L
   L02) l (K     L

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n

.group o
        o        o

.group ö
        ö        W

.group p
        p        p

.group r
        r        R
     A) r (A     *
     ğ) r (A     *
     C) r (_     @-r

.group s
        s        s

.group ş
        ş        S

.group t
        t        t
   L03) t (L03   ts

.group u
        u        u

.group ü
        ü        y

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z

.group
        ä        &
